Hawaii, session 2025, HB660.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Beginning January 1,     , no new applications for registration of title shall be made or accepted in the land court, pursuant to part I of chapter 501, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 2.  No later than December 31,     , all registered owners of an interest in property registered in the land court shall initiate deregistration of the property pursuant to part II of chapter 501, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 3.  The land court shall inform all registered owners of any interest in property registered in land court of the requirement under section 2 of this Act. SECTION 4.  The subpart entitled "Land Court; Personnel", of part I of chapter 501, Hawaii Revised Statutes, consisting of sections 501-1 to 501-13, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is repealed. SECTION 5.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the land court to inform registered owners of any interest in property registered in land court of the requirement for deregistration of property pursuant to this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the land court for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6.  All rights, powers, functions, and duties of the land court are transferred to the bureau of conveyances.  All employees who occupy civil service positions and whose functions are transferred to the bureau of conveyances by this Act shall retain their civil service status, whether permanent or temporary.  Employees shall be transferred without loss of salary, seniority (except as prescribed by applicable collective bargaining agreements), retention points, prior service credit, any vacation and sick leave credits previously earned, and other rights, benefits, and privileges, in accordance with state personnel laws and this Act; provided that the employees possess the minimum qualifications and public employment requirements for the class or position to which transferred or appointed, as applicable; provided further that subsequent changes in status may be made pursuant to applicable civil service and compensation laws. Any employee who, prior to this Act, is exempt from civil service and is transferred as a consequence of this Act may retain the employee's exempt status but shall not be appointed to a civil service position as a consequence of this Act.  An exempt employee who is transferred by this Act shall not suffer any loss of prior service credit, vacation or sick leave credits previously earned, or other employee benefits or privileges as a consequence of this Act; provided that the employees possess legal and public employment requirements for the position to which transferred or appointed, as applicable; provided further that subsequent changes in status may be made pursuant to applicable employment and compensation laws.  The chairperson of the board of land and natural resources may prescribe the duties and qualifications of these employees and fix their salaries without regard to chapter 76, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 7.  All appropriations, records, equipment, machines, files, supplies, contracts, books, papers, documents, maps, and other personal property heretofore made, used, acquired, or held by the land court relating to the functions transferred to the department of land and natural resources shall be transferred with the functions to which they relate. SECTION 8.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025; provided that sections 4, 6, and 7 shall take effect on June 30,     . INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________